North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 4. Timeshares.
§ 93A-44.
Contract of sale; public offering statement.

The contract of sale between a developer and a purchaser for the sale and purchase of a timeshare must include the following:

The name and address of the developer.

The name and address of the timeshare program being offered.

An identification or legal description of the timeshare being sold, including whether any interest in real property or personal property is being conveyed and the number of years constituting the term of the timeshare program or the timeshare if less than the term of the timeshare program.

If the purchaser acquires a timeshare in a specific timeshare project, the name and location of the timeshare project to which the specific timeshare relates.

A statement that the purchaser should refer to the timeshare public offering statement for more information required to be provided to the purchaser.

The initial purchase price and all additional charges to which the purchaser may be subject in connection with the purchase of the timeshare, such as financing, or which will be collected from the purchaser on or before closing, such as the current year’s annual assessment or any initial or special fee together with a description of the purpose of such initial or special fee.

A statement disclosing the amount of the periodic assessments currently assessed against or collected from owners who own similar types of timeshares in that timeshare program.

The name and address of the independent escrow agent required by G.S. 93A-45(d).

The purchaser’s address for the purposes of delivery of any notices.

The date the purchaser signs the contract of sale.

The following statement in conspicuous type:

“Any resale of this timeshare must be accompanied by certain disclosures in accordance with the North Carolina Timeshare Act.”

A statement in conspicuous type immediately prior to the purchaser’s signature block in substantially the following form:

“You may cancel this contract of sale without any penalty or obligation before midnight five days after the date you sign this contract of sale or received the required public offering statement and all documents required to be delivered to you, whichever is later. If you decide to cancel this contract of sale, you must notify the developer in writing of your intent to cancel. Your notice of cancellation shall be effective upon the date sent and shall be sent to the developer at [insert address]. Any attempt to obtain a waiver of your cancellation right is void and of no effect. While you may execute all closing documents in advance, the closing on your purchase before expiration of your five-day cancellation period is prohibited.”

Prior to the execution of a contract of sale by a purchaser, each developer shall provide the purchaser with a public offering statement and shall obtain from the purchaser a written acknowledgement of receipt of the public offering statement and any documents required to be delivered to the purchaser. In addition to any other information that the developer discloses, the public offering statement must contain the following:

A cover page stating only the name of the timeshare program and in conspicuous type, substantially the following statement:

“This public offering statement contains important matters to be considered in acquiring a timeshare. The statements contained in this public offering statement are only summary in nature. Purchaser should refer to all references, accompanying exhibits, contract documents, finance documents, and sales materials. Purchaser should not rely upon oral representations as being correct. The developer is prohibited from making any representations other than those contained in the contract of sale and this public offering statement.”

The name and principal address of the developer.

A general description of the timeshare program, including the nature and types of timeshares in the timeshare program and if it is a multisite timeshare program.

A description of the duration of the timeshare program and whether it includes timeshares having a shorter duration than the duration of the timeshare program.

A description of the method by which an owner can reserve, use, and occupy the timeshare units, including the following:

The name and principal address of the entity that owns the reservation system and the entity responsible for operating the reservation system, their relationship to the developer, and the duration of any agreement for operating the reservation system.

A summary of the material rules governing access to and use of the reservation system, including (i) a description of the limitations, restrictions, or priorities applied in the operation of the timeshare program, (ii) if such limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied, a description of the manner in which they are applied, (iii) an explanation of any priority reservation features that affect an owner’s ability to make reservations for the use of a given timeshare unit on a first-come, first-served basis, (iv) whether the owner must be in good standing with respect to payment of all sums due the managing entity in order to reserve, use, or occupy a timeshare unit, and (v) the terms and conditions for making, deferring, or cancelling reservations, including any transaction fees or other charges and, if applicable, a statement that such fees or charges are subject to change without owner approval.

Any periodic adjustment or amendment to the reservation system that may be conducted in order to respond to owner use patterns and changes in owner use demand for the timeshare units, timeshare projects, or timeshare periods. If ownership or use of the timeshare program is based on a point system, a statement indicating the circumstances by which the point values may change, the extent of such changes, and the person or entity responsible for the changes.

Whether and under what circumstances an owner may lose the right to reserve, use, or occupy a timeshare unit without being provided with a substitute reservation, use, or occupancy.

The disposition of timeshares or time periods that are not reserved by owners prior to the start of the timeshare period or prior to the start of any established point in time and who has the right to reserve and benefit from such unreserved timeshares or timeshare periods.

If the operator of the reservation system is going to exercise the right granted to it by G.S. 93A-63(d) to reserve, deposit, or rent the timeshare periods or timeshare units for the purpose of facilitating the use or future use of the timeshare periods or timeshare units or other benefits made available through the timeshare program by owners, a statement in conspicuous type, in substantially the following form, shall be included:

“The managing entity shall have the right to forecast anticipated reservation and use of the timeshare period or timeshare units and is authorized to reasonably reserve, deposit, or rent the timeshare period or timeshare units for the purpose of facilitating the use or future use of the accommodations or other benefits made available through the timeshare program by the owners.”

Any use or transaction fees or charges to be paid by owners for the reservation, use, or occupancy of any timeshare units or amenities and, if applicable, a statement that the fees or charges are subject to change without owner approval.

The rules governing the making, cancelling, or transferring of reservations.

For each timeshare project, the following information:

A description of the existing timeshare units and future timeshare units committed to be constructed or obtained, including the location of the timeshare project or timeshare projects in the timeshare program, and the number of bedrooms, number of bathrooms, sleeping capacity, and whether the timeshare unit contains a full kitchen for each timeshare project.

A description of any existing amenities and future amenities committed to be constructed or obtained, and whether such amenities are included as part of the ownership of a timeshare or made separately available and on what basis.

The estimated date that future timeshare units or amenities will be available as committed, and a description of financial arrangements for the completion or acquisition of future timeshare units or amenities as committed.

A description of the method and timing for performing maintenance of the timeshare units.

A statement indicating that, on an annual basis, the one-to-one use night to use right ratio will be maintained through the duration of the timeshare program, except temporarily pursuant to G.S. 93A-61(g), or temporarily as a result of a casualty or eminent domain action.

For multisite timeshare programs, a description of (i) any reserved rights to make additions, substitutions, or deletions of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects, (ii) who has the authority to make such additions, substitutions, or deletions and whether owners have the right to consent, and (iii) the basis upon which such timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects may be added to, substituted for, or deleted from the timeshare program.

With respect to the managing entity for the timeshare program, the following information, if applicable:

The name and principal address of the managing entity of the timeshare program.

Whether the managing entity for any timeshare project is different than the managing entity of the multisite timeshare program.

If there is a timeshare owners’ association at a timeshare project or for a multisite timeshare program, whether owners are members of the timeshare owners’ association, together with a general description of their rights and responsibilities with respect to the timeshare owners’ association.

If there is a management firm, the term of the management agreement.

A description of the method for calculating and apportioning assessments among owners, including the developer, together with a description of the consequences to the owner if assessments are not timely paid. The description shall also include whether reserves for the timeshare units and amenities have been established, and if not, or if any reserves are not fully funded, a statement to that effect in conspicuous type.

If the developer intends to guarantee the level of assessments for the timeshare program, a statement disclosing that the developer may be excused from the payment of the developer’s share of the assessments which would have been assessed against developer-owned timeshares during the guarantee period.

A statement that the timeshare to be acquired by the purchaser and the timeshare property, on or before closing, (i) will be free and clear of any interest in or lien or encumbrance against the timeshare and the timeshare property by the developer or any interest holders or (ii) are the subject of a recorded subordination and notice to creditors instrument pursuant to

G.S. 93A-57

.

A description of any civil or criminal suit or adjudication or disciplinary actions material to the timeshare program of which the developer has knowledge, including any bankruptcy of the developer that is pending or that has occurred within the past five years.

A description of the insurance insuring the timeshare property for damage and destruction and insuring owners and, if applicable, the timeshare owners’ association.

A description of the requirements for, or restraint on, the transfer or rental of a timeshare, including any right of first refusal or the imposition of any fees or charges.

A statement disclosing that any funds paid to the developer in connection with the purchase of a timeshare shall be held by an independent escrow agent in accordance with G.S. 93A-45(d) or that the developer has provided financial assurances in an amount equal to or in excess of the funds that would otherwise be held by the independent escrow agent, and that if the purchaser elects to exercise the right of cancellation or the developer defaults under the contract of sale, any funds paid to the developer shall be returned to the purchaser, as set forth in G.S. 93A-45(c).

If the developer or managing entity provides purchasers with the opportunity to become a member of an exchange program in connection with the purchase of the timeshare, the name and address of the exchange company and the material terms of the opportunity.

Any person who has or may have the right to alter, amend, or add to fees and charges to which the owner may be subject and the terms and conditions under which those fees and charges may be imposed.

In conspicuous type, a statement in substantially the following form:

“The purchase of a timeshare should be based upon its value as a vacation experience or for spending leisure time, and not considered for purposes of acquiring an appreciating investment or with an expectation that the timeshare may be rented or resold.”

A statement that under North Carolina law a timeshare instrument conveying a timeshare estate located in this State must be recorded in the register of deeds office at closing.

Any other information which the Commission may by rule require. The Commission is also authorized to prescribe by rule the form of the public offering statement that must be furnished by the developer to each purchaser.

Prior to the execution of a contract of sale by a purchaser, the following documents, including any amendments, shall also be provided to the purchaser either attached as an exhibit to the public offering statement or provided as a separate supplement with the public offering statement:

The timeshare declaration.

The timeshare owners’ association articles of incorporation and bylaws, if applicable.

Any timeshare unit or timeshare project rules and regulations.

Timeshare program reservation system rules and regulations.

An estimate of the current year’s operating budget for the timeshare program.

For multisite timeshare programs where a timeshare is provided in a particular timeshare unit or timeshare project, the applicable documents governing the timeshare unit or timeshare project set forth in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this subsection must also be separately provided as part of the public offering statement.

Contemporaneously with the execution of a contract of sale by a purchaser, a copy of the contract of sale signed by the purchaser, receipt for the public offering statement signed by the purchaser, any financing documents signed by the purchaser, and any other document signed by the purchaser at the time of execution of the contract of sale shall be provided to the purchaser.

If the purchaser receives documents electronically at the time of execution of a contract of sale, the developer shall provide the purchaser a separate paper or email copy of the purchaser’s cancellation rights in conspicuous type as described in G.S. 93A-44(a)(12).

The developer is prohibited from making any representations other than those contained in the contract of sale and the public offering statement.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-45.
Purchaser’s right to cancel; escrow; violation.

A purchaser has the right to cancel the contract of sale until midnight of the fifth day after the later of the following events:

The purchaser’s execution of the contract of sale.

The purchaser’s receipt of the public offering statement pursuant to

G.S. 93A-44

and all other documents required to be provided to the purchaser pursuant to

G.S. 93A-44

.

The purchaser may not waive this right of cancellation. Any oral or written declaration or instrument that purports to waive this right of cancellation is void. No closing may occur until the cancellation period of the purchaser has expired.

Any notice of cancellation shall be considered given on the date postmarked if mailed, or when transmitted if delivered by electronic means, so long as the notice is actually received by the developer or independent escrow agent. If given by means of a writing transmitted other than by mail, the notice of cancellation shall be considered given at the time of delivery at the place for receipt of notice provided by the developer.

Cancellation under this section is without penalty, and the refund of all monies received by the developer or timeshare salesperson shall be made within 20 days of demand therefor by the purchaser or within five days after receipt of cleared funds from the purchaser, whichever is later.

Prior to a purchaser’s execution of a contract of sale, the developer shall establish an escrow account with an independent escrow agent for the purpose of protecting the funds of purchasers required to be escrowed by this subsection. Any funds received prior to closing by a developer or timeshare salesperson in connection with the sale of the timeshare shall be immediately deposited by the developer or salesperson in a trust or escrow account in a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State and shall only be disbursed in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. Payments held in such trust or escrow accounts shall be deemed to belong to the purchaser and not the developer. In lieu of escrow requirements, the Commission shall have the authority to accept, in its discretion, alternative financial assurances adequate to protect the purchaser’s interest during the contract of sale cancellation period, including, but not limited to, a surety bond, corporate bond, cash deposit or irrevocable letter of credit in an amount equal to the escrow requirements or a financial assurance posted in another jurisdiction.

A developer shall not be entitled to the release of any escrowed funds until the developer has provided the independent escrow agent with (i) an affidavit stating that the purchaser has defaulted under the contract of sale and the developer is entitled to the escrowed funds pursuant to the terms of the contract of sale or (ii) an affidavit that the developer has performed all of its obligations under the purchase contract, including completion of construction of all promised timeshare units and amenities or the posting of an alternate financial assurance acceptable to the Commission securing the completion of construction, and the developer and purchaser have closed on the contract of sale, together with evidence satisfactory to the independent escrow agent that the timeshare and the timeshare property is either free and clear of interests in or liens or encumbrances against the timeshare and timeshare property of any interest holder or the developer has met the requirements of G.S. 93A-57(a).

An independent escrow agent shall maintain the accounts called for in this section only in such a manner as to be under the direct supervision and control of the independent escrow agent. The independent escrow agent shall have a fiduciary duty to each purchaser to maintain the escrow accounts in accordance with good accounting practices and to release the purchaser’s funds or other property from escrow only in accordance with this section. The independent escrow agent shall retain all affidavits received pursuant to this section for a period of five years. Should the independent escrow agent receive conflicting demands for funds or other property held in escrow that remain unresolved for more than 30 days, the independent escrow agent shall notify the Commission of the dispute and either promptly submit the matter to arbitration or, by interpleader or otherwise, seek an adjudication of the matter by court.

If the contract of sale does not include the cancellation notice as required by G.S. 93A-44(a)(12), the owner, in addition to any rights to damages or other relief, is entitled to void the transfer and receive from the developer all funds paid for the timeshare together with an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the sales price of the timeshare not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000).

A timeshare declaration or other instrument establishing or governing a timeshare program or an underlying timeshare property regime is not an encumbrance for purposes of this Chapter and does not create a requirement for a subordination and notice to creditors instrument for purposes of this section from any person.

Any developer or independent escrow agent who intentionally fails to comply with the provisions of this Article concerning the establishment of an escrow account, deposits of funds into escrow, and withdrawal therefrom is guilty of a Class E felony. The failure to establish an escrow account or to place funds therein as required in this section is prima facie evidence of an intentional and purposeful violation of this subsection.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2001-487, s. 23(j); 2017-25, s. 1(l); 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 1(
l
), effective June 2, 2017, substituted “a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State” for “an insured bank or savings and loan association in North Carolina” in subsection (c); and made a stylistic change.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-46.
Prizes.

An advertisement of a timeshare which includes the offer of a prize or other inducement shall fully comply with the provisions of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “timeshare” for “time share” towards the beginning. For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 93A-47.
Timeshare proxies.

No proxy, power of attorney or similar device given by the owner of a timeshare regarding voting in a timeshare owners’ association shall exceed one year in duration, but the same may be renewed from year to year.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-48.
Exchange programs.

If a purchaser is offered the opportunity to subscribe to any exchange program, the developer shall, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, deliver to the purchaser, prior to the execution of (i) any contract between the purchaser and the exchange company, and (ii) the contract for sale, at least the following information regarding the exchange program:

The name and address of the exchange company.

The names of all officers, directors, and shareholders owning five percent (5%) or more of the outstanding stock of the exchange company.

Whether the exchange company or any of its officers or directors has any legal or beneficial interest in any developer or managing entity for any timeshare project participating in the exchange program and, if so, the name and location of the timeshare project and the nature of the interest.

Unless the exchange company is also the developer a statement that the purchaser’s contract with the exchange company is a contract separate and distinct from the contract for sale.

Whether the purchaser’s participation in the exchange program is dependent upon the continued affiliation of the timeshare project with the exchange program.

Whether the purchaser’s membership or participation, or both, in the exchange program is voluntary or mandatory.

A complete and accurate description of the terms and conditions of the purchaser’s contractual relationship with the exchange company and the procedure by which changes thereto may be made.

A complete and accurate description of the procedure to qualify for and effectuate exchanges.

A complete and accurate description of all limitations, restrictions, or priorities employed in the operation of the exchange program, including, but not limited to, limitations on exchanges based on seasonality, unit size, or levels of occupancy, expressed in conspicuous type, and, in the event that such limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied by the exchange program, a clear description of the manner in which they are applied.

Whether exchanges are arranged on a space available basis and whether any guarantees of fulfillment of specific requests for exchanges are made by the exchange program.

Whether and under what circumstances an owner, in dealing with the exchange company, may lose the use and occupancy of the owner’s timeshare in any properly applied for exchange without being provided with substitute accommodations by the exchange company.

The expenses, fees or range of fees for participation by owners in the exchange program, a statement whether any such fees may be altered by the exchange company, and the circumstances under which alterations may be made.

The name and address of the site of each timeshare project or other property which is participating in the exchange program.

The number of units in each timeshare project or other property participating in the exchange program which are available for occupancy and which qualify for participation in the exchange program, expressed within the following numerical groupings, 1-5, 6-10, 11-20, 21-50 and 51, and over.

The number of owners with respect to each timeshare project or other property which are eligible to participate in the exchange program expressed within the following numerical groupings, 1-100, 101-249, 250-499, 500-999, and 1,000 and over, and a statement of the criteria used to determine those owners who are currently eligible to participate in the exchange program.

The disposition made by the exchange company of timeshares deposited with the exchange program by owners eligible to participate in the exchange program and not used by the exchange company in effecting exchanges.

The following information which, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shall be independently audited by a certified public accountant in accordance with the standards of the Accounting Standards Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and reported for each year no later than July 1, of the succeeding year:

The number of owners enrolled in the exchange program and such numbers shall disclose the relationship between the exchange company and owners as being either fee paying or gratuitous in nature.

The number of timeshare projects or other properties eligible to participate in the exchange program categorized by those having a contractual relationship between the developer or the association and the exchange company and those having solely a contractual relationship between the exchange company and owners directly.

The percentage of confirmed exchanges, which shall be the number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company divided by the number of exchanges properly applied for, together with a complete and accurate statement of the criteria used to determine whether an exchange requested was properly applied for.

The number of timeshares or other intervals for which the exchange company has an outstanding obligation to provide an exchange to an owner who relinquished a timeshare or interval during the year in exchange for a timeshare or interval in any future year.

The number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company during the year.

A statement in conspicuous type to the effect that the percentage described in sub-subdivision c. of subdivision (17) of this subsection is a summary of the exchange requests entered with the exchange company in the period reported and that the percentage does not indicate a purchaser’s/owner’s probabilities of being confirmed to any specific choice or range of choices, since availability at individual locations may vary.

The purchaser shall certify in writing to the receipt of the information required by this subsection and any other information which the Commission may by rule require.

The information required by subdivisions (2), (3), (13), (14), (15), and (17) of subsection (a) of this section shall be accurate as of December 31 of the year preceding the year in which the information is delivered, except for information delivered within the first 180 days of any calendar year which shall be accurate as of December 31 of the year two years preceding the year in which the information is delivered to the purchaser. The remaining information required by subsection (a) of this section shall be accurate as of a date which is no more than 30 days prior to the date on which the information is delivered to the purchaser.

In the event an exchange company offers an exchange program directly to the purchaser or owner, the exchange company shall deliver to each purchaser or owner, concurrently with the offering and prior to the execution of any contract between the purchaser or owner and the exchange company the information set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to any renewal of a contract between an owner and an exchange company.

All promotional brochures, pamphlets, advertisements, or other materials disseminated by the exchange company to purchasers in this State which contain the percentage of confirmed exchanges described in sub-subdivision c. of subdivision (17) of subsection (a) of this section must include the statement set forth in subdivision (18) of subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 23(k); 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-49.
Service of process on exchange company.

Any exchange company offering an exchange program to a purchaser shall be deemed to have made an irrevocable appointment of the Commission to receive service of lawful process in any proceeding against the exchange company arising under this Article.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-50.
Securities laws apply.

The North Carolina Securities Act, Chapter 78A, shall also apply, in addition to the laws relating to real estate, to timeshares deemed to be investment contracts or to other securities offered with or incident to a timeshare; provided, however, in the event of the applicability of the North Carolina Securities Act, any offer or sale of timeshares registered under this Article shall not be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 78A-24

and any real estate broker registered under Article 1 of this Chapter shall not be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 78A-36

.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2005-395, s. 21; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 21, effective April 1, 2006, deleted “or salesperson” following “broker” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “timeshares deemed to be investment contracts or to other securities offered with or incident to a timeshare; provided, however, in the event of the applicability of the North Carolina Securities Act, any offer or sale of timeshares registered” for “time shares deemed to be investment contracts or to other securities offered with or incident to a time share; provided, in the event of such applicability of the North Carolina Securities Act, any offer or sale of time shares registered.” For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-51.
Rule-making authority.

The Commission shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Article and the General Statutes of North Carolina. The Commission may prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the Commission.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).